Hawaii statutes.
§460J-20 Document expressing an opinion or
making statement regarding the presence or absence of termites; contents.
Any work contract, billing, agreement, letter of work completed, or other
correspondence or document, expressing an opinion or making a statement
relating to the presence or absence of termites shall refer to the report
defined in section 460J-19(b). Such documents shall indicate specifically
whether all of the recommended work as set forth in the inspection report was
completed, or, if not, it shall indicate specifically which recommendations
were not completed. [L 1972, c 134, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 74, §7]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next